Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Protective Orders.

Sec. 18.66.100.
Protective orders: eligible petitioners; relief.

A person who is or has been a victim of a crime involving domestic violence may file a petition in the district or superior court for a protective order against a household member. A parent, guardian, or other representative appointed by the court under this section may file a petition for a protective order on behalf of a minor. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem or attorney to represent the minor. Notwithstanding AS

25.24.310

or this section, the office of public advocacy may not be appointed as a guardian ad litem or attorney for a minor in a petition filed under this section unless the petition has been filed on behalf of the minor.

When a petition for a protective order is filed, the court shall schedule a hearing and provide at least 10 days’ notice to the respondent of the hearing and of the respondent’s right to appear and be heard, either in person or by an attorney. If the court finds by a preponderance of evidence that the respondent has committed a crime involving domestic violence against the petitioner, regardless of whether the respondent appears at the hearing, the court may order any relief available under (c) of this section. The provisions of a protective order issued under

(c)(1) of this section are effective until further order of the court;

(c)(2) — (16) of this section are effective for one year unless earlier dissolved by court order.

A protective order under this section may

prohibit the respondent from threatening to commit or committing domestic violence, stalking, or harassment;

prohibit the respondent from telephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating directly or indirectly with the petitioner;

remove and exclude the respondent from the residence of the petitioner, regardless of ownership of the residence;

direct the respondent to stay away from the residence, school, or place of employment of the petitioner or any specified place frequented by the petitioner or any designated household member;

prohibit the respondent from entering a propelled vehicle in the possession of or occupied by the petitioner;

prohibit the respondent from using or possessing a deadly weapon if the court finds the respondent was in the actual possession of or used a weapon during the commission of domestic violence;

direct the respondent to surrender any firearm owned or possessed by the respondent if the court finds that the respondent was in the actual possession of or used a firearm during the commission of the domestic violence;

request a peace officer to accompany the petitioner to the petitioner’s residence to ensure that the petitioner

safely obtains possession of the petitioner’s residence, vehicle, or personal items; and

is able to safely remove a vehicle or personal items from the petitioner’s residence;

award temporary custody of a minor child to the petitioner and may arrange for visitation with a minor child if the safety of the child and the petitioner can be protected; if visitation is allowed, the court may order visitation under the conditions provided in AS

25.20.061

;

give the petitioner possession and use of a vehicle and other essential personal items, including a pet, regardless of ownership of the items;

prohibit the respondent from consuming controlled substances;

require the respondent to pay support for the petitioner, a minor child in the care of the petitioner, or a pet in the care of the petitioner if there is an independent legal obligation of the respondent to support the petitioner, child, or pet;

require the respondent to reimburse the petitioner or other person for expenses associated with the domestic violence, including medical expenses, counseling, shelter, and repair or replacement of damaged property;

require the respondent to pay costs and fees incurred by the petitioner in bringing the action under this chapter;

order the respondent, at the respondent’s expense, to participate in (A) a program for the rehabilitation of perpetrators of domestic violence that meets the standards set by, and that is approved by, the Department of Corrections under AS

44.28.020(b)

, or (B) treatment for the abuse of alcohol or controlled substances, or both; a protective order under this section may not require a respondent to participate in a program for the rehabilitation of perpetrators of domestic violence unless the program meets the standards set by, and that is approved by, the Department of Corrections under AS

44.28.020(b)

;

order other relief the court determines necessary to protect the petitioner or any household member.

If the court issues a protective order under this section, it shall

make reasonable efforts to ensure that the order is understood by the petitioner and by the respondent, if present; and

have the order delivered to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for expedited service and for entry into the central registry of protective orders under AS

18.65.540

.

A court may not deny a petition for a protective order under this section solely because

there is a lapse of time between an act of domestic violence and the filing of the petition;

the act of domestic violence was the basis for a previous protective order; or

a court previously found that the incident was a crime of domestic violence committed against the petitioner but declined to order relief under this section, if the petition alleges a change in circumstances since the court’s previous finding.

Within 30 days before, or within 60 days after, the expiration of a protective order issued or extended under (b)(2) of this section, a petitioner may petition the court for an extension of the protective order. The court shall schedule a hearing and provide at least 10 days’ notice to the respondent of the hearing and of the respondent’s right to appear and be heard, either in person or through an attorney. If the court finds that an extension of the provisions of the order is necessary to protect the petitioner from domestic violence, regardless of whether the respondent appears at the hearing, the court may extend the provisions of the order. An extension granted under this subsection is effective for one year unless earlier dissolved by court order. If the court grants an extension before the protective order expires, the extension takes effect on the day the protective order would have expired.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 14 ch 86 SLA 1998; am § 23 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 15 ch 60 SLA 2016; am §§
4, 5 ch 7 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For related provisions concerning criminal trespass, see
AS

11.46.320

—

11.46.350

; for related provisions concerning violation of restraining orders, see
AS

11.56.740

; for related provisions concerning violating an order under this section while possessing certain weapons, see
AS

11.61.200(a)(8)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 17, 2017, in (c)(10), inserted “including a pet,” following “essential personal items”, in (c)(12), inserted “, or a pet in the care of the petitioner” following “minor child in the care of the petitioner”, added “, or a pet” at the end, and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment, effective September 8, 2019, added (e)(2) and (3) and made related and stylistic changes; added (f).

Editor's notes. —

Section 74, ch. 64, SLA 1996 provides that a domestic violence restraining order “issued under former AS

25.35.010

or 25.35.020 and in effect on July 1, 1996 remains in effect until it expires under the terms of the order and former AS

25.35.010

or 25.35.020 or is dissolved by the court, whichever occurs earlier.”

Pursuant to § 23, ch. 86, SLA 1998, the amendment of paragraph (c)(15) by § 14, ch. 86, SLA 1998 took effect on May 13, 1999, six months after the effective date of regulations adopted by the Department of Corrections under AS

44.28.020(b)

, which effective date was November 13, 1998.

Under sec. 6,
ch. 7, SLA 2019, the 2019 amendment of (e) of this section and enactment of (f) of this section applies “to protective orders issued before, on, or after September 8, 2019.”

Sec. 18.66.110.
Ex parte and emergency protective orders.

A person who is a victim of a crime involving domestic violence may file a petition under AS

18.66.100(a)

and request an ex parte protective order. If the court finds that the petition establishes probable cause that a crime involving domestic violence has occurred, it is necessary to protect the petitioner from domestic violence, and if the petitioner has certified to the court in writing the efforts, if any, that have been made to provide notice to the respondent, the court shall ex parte and without notice to the respondent issue a protective order. An ex parte protective order may grant the protection provided by AS

18.66.100(c)(1)

— (5), (8) — (12), and (16). An ex parte protective order expires 20 days after it is issued unless dissolved earlier by the court at the request of either the petitioner or the respondent and after notice and, if requested, a hearing. If a court issues an ex parte protective order, the court shall have the order delivered to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for expedited service and for entry into the central registry of protective orders under AS

18.65.540

.

A peace officer, on behalf of and with the consent of a victim of a crime involving domestic violence, may request an emergency protective order from a judicial officer. The request may be made orally or in writing based upon the sworn statement of a peace officer, and in person or by telephone. If the court finds probable cause to believe that the victim is in immediate danger of domestic violence based on an allegation of the recent commission of a crime involving domestic violence, the court ex parte shall issue an emergency protective order. In an emergency protective order, the court may grant the protection provided by AS

18.66.100(c)(1)

— (5), (8), (10), (11), and (16). An emergency protective order expires 72 hours after it is issued unless dissolved earlier by the court at the request of the petitioner.

A peace officer who obtains an emergency protective order under (b) of this section shall

place the provisions of an oral order in writing on a form provided by the court and file the written order with the issuing court by the end of the judicial day after it was issued;

provide a copy of the order to the petitioner;

serve a copy of the order on the respondent; and

comply with the requirements of AS

18.65.540

for ensuring that the order is entered into the central registry of protective orders under AS

18.65.540

.

A court may not deny a petition for an ex parte protective order filed under (a) of this section solely because of a lapse of time between an act of domestic violence and the filing of the petition.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 65, see § 78, ch. 64, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.66.120.
Modification of protective orders.

Either the petitioner or the respondent may request modification of a protective order. If a request is made for modification of

an ex parte protective order under AS

18.66.110(a)

, the court shall schedule a hearing on three days’ notice or on shorter notice as the court may prescribe; the court shall hear and rule on the request in an expeditious manner; or

a protective order after notice and hearing under AS

18.66.100(b)

, the court shall schedule a hearing within 20 days after the date the request is made, except that if the court finds that the request is meritless on its face, the court may deny the request without further hearing.

If a request for a modification is made under this section and the respondent raises an issue not raised by the petitioner, the court may allow the petitioner additional time to respond.

If the court modifies a protective order under this section, it shall issue a modified order and shall

make reasonable efforts to ensure that the order is understood by the petitioner and by the respondent, if present at the hearing; and

have the order delivered to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for expedited service and for entry into the central registry of protective orders under AS

18.65.540

.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 65, see § 78, ch. 64, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.66.130.
Specific protective orders.

If a respondent in a protective order issued under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

is prohibited from communicating with the petitioner, excluded from the residence of the petitioner, or ordered to stay away from the petitioner as provided in AS

18.66.100(c)(2)

— (5), an invitation by the petitioner to communicate, enter the residence or vehicle, or have other prohibited contact with the petitioner does not waive or nullify any provision in a protective order.

A court may not grant protective orders against the petitioner and the respondent in the same action under this chapter.

A court may not order parties into mediation or refer them to mediation for resolution of the issues arising from a petition for a protective order under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

.

In addition to other required information contained in a protective order, the order must include in bold face type the following statements:

“Violation of this order may be a misdemeanor, punishable by up to one year of incarceration and up to a $25,000 fine”;

“If you are ordered to have no contact with the petitioner or to stay away from the petitioner’s residence, vehicle, or other place designated by the court, an invitation by the petitioner to have the prohibited contact or to be present at or enter the residence, vehicle, or other place does not in any way invalidate or nullify the order.”

A protective order issued under this chapter is in addition to and not in place of any other civil or criminal remedy. A petitioner is not barred from seeking an order under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

because of the existence of another civil action between the petitioner and respondent.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 27 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 18 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 65, see § 78, ch. 64, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (d)(1), substituted “$25,000” for “$10,000” near the end.

Sec. 18.66.140.
Filing and enforcement of protective orders issued in other states.

A certified copy of an unexpired protective order issued in another jurisdiction may be filed with the clerk of court in any judicial district in this state.

A protective order issued in another jurisdiction has the same effect and must be recognized and enforced in the same manner as a protective order issued by a court of this state, regardless of whether the protective order issued in another jurisdiction is filed as described in (a) of this section, if the protective order is

issued by a court of the United States, a court of another state or territory, a United States military tribunal, or a tribal court;

related to domestic violence; and

entitled to full faith and credit under 18 U.S.C. 2265.

When a protective order is filed with the court under this section, the court shall have the order delivered to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for entry into the central registry of protective orders under AS

18.65.540

.

A protective order issued in another jurisdiction that appears authentic on its face is presumed valid.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§ 19, 20 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective September 17, 2017, in (b), in the introductory language, substituted “issued in another jurisdiction” for “filed in accordance with (a) of this section” following “A protective order”, in the introductory language in (b), added “, regardless of whether the protective order issued in another jurisdiction is filed as described in (a) of this section, if the protective order is” following “issued by a court of this state”, added (b)(1)-(3); added (d).

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Violence Against Women Act, 18 U.S.C. 2265 (VAWA) requires the State of Alaska to enforce tribal protection orders and foreign protection orders, even where those orders are not registered as required by Alaska law. The unregistered protective order must meet due process requirements, including notice and the opportunity to be heard. If the order would qualify for arrest of the violator under an equivalent Alaska law, the violator may be arrested. The legislature is encouraged to revise Alaska's statutes to comply with VAWA. July 30, 2015 Op. Att'y Gen.

Sec. 18.66.150.
Forms for petitions and orders; fees.

The Alaska Court System, after consulting with the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault and other interested persons and organizations, shall prepare forms for petitions, protective orders, and instructions for their use by a person seeking a protective order under this chapter. The forms must conform to the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, except that information on the forms may be filled in by legible handwriting.

In addition to other information required, a petition for a protective order must include a statement of pending civil actions or domestic violence criminal actions involving either the petitioner or the respondent. While a protective order is in effect or a petition for protective order is pending, both the petitioner and respondent have a continuing duty to inform the court of pending civil actions or domestic violence criminal actions involving either the petitioner or the respondent.

The office of the clerk of each superior and district court shall make available to the public under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

the forms a person seeking a protective order under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

may need and instructions for the use of the forms. The clerk shall provide assistance in completing the forms and filing the forms.

Filing fees may not be charged in any action seeking only the relief provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For effect of subsection (d) on Alaska Rule of Administration 9, see § 76, ch. 64, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For related court rules on filing fees, see Admin. R. 9(f)(1) and Admin. R. 10.

Sec. 18.66.160.
Service of process.

Unless, on the record in court, the person has already been provided a copy of the court’s order, process issued under this chapter shall be promptly served and executed. If process is to be served upon a person believed to be present or residing in a municipality, as defined in AS

29.71.800

, or in an unincorporated community, process shall be served by a peace officer of that municipality or unincorporated community who has jurisdiction within the area of service. If a peace officer of the municipality or unincorporated community who has jurisdiction is not available, a superior court, district court, or magistrate may designate any other peace officer to serve and execute process. A state peace officer shall serve process in any area that is not within the jurisdiction of a peace officer of a municipality or unincorporated community. A peace officer shall use every reasonable means to serve process issued under this chapter. A judge may not order a peace officer to serve a petition that has been denied by the court.

Service of process under (a) of this section does not preclude a petitioner from using any other available means to serve process issued under this chapter.

Fees for service of process may not be charged in a proceeding seeking only the relief provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 22 ch 19 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Alaska Rule of Administration 9 and Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 4, see §§ 76 and 77, ch. 64, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.66.170.
Notification of law enforcement agencies.

When a court issues or accepts for filing a protective order under this chapter, it shall send a copy of the order to the appropriate local law enforcement agency. Each law enforcement agency shall establish procedures to inform peace officers of protective orders. Peace officers shall use every reasonable means to enforce a protective order issued or filed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Sec. 18.66.180.
Civil liability.

A person may not bring a civil action for damages against the state, its officers, agents, or employees, or a law enforcement agency, its officers, agents, or employees for any failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996)